apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
	<pardef n="आ__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तीं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ई</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ईं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    


	   
	 <pardef n="सो__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तीं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ई</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ईं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    
	

	<e lm="कतरा"><i>कतरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घबरा"><i>घबरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चकरा"><i>चकरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिल्ला"><i>चिल्ला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जगमगा"><i>जगमगा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जा"><i>जा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="झुंझला"><i>झुंझला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="टकरा"><i>टकरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="डगमगा"><i>डगमगा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="तिलमिला"><i>तिलमिला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="तुतला"><i>तुतला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="नहा"><i>नहा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पछता"><i>पछता</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="फहरा"><i>फहरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बौखला"><i>बौखला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="मुरझा"><i>मुरझा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रो"><i>रो</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लगा"><i>लगा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लड़खड़ा"><i>लड़खड़ा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ललचा"><i>ललचा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लहरा"><i>लहरा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लुभा"><i>लुभा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="शरमा"><i>शरमा</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सुस्ता"><i>सुस्ता</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हकला"><i>हकला</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हिनहिना"><i>हिनहिना</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सो"><i>सो</i><par n="सो__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आ"><i>आ</i><par n="आ__vblex_iv"/></e>
